Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-176
Sale or delivery to unauthorized person forbidden; suspension, cancellation, or revocation of license.

No manufacturer or wholesaler shall sell or deliver any package containing alcoholic liquor manufactured or distributed by such manufacturer or wholesaler for resale unless the person to whom such package is sold or delivered is authorized to receive such package in accordance with the Nebraska Liquor Control Act. The commission shall suspend, cancel, or revoke the license of any manufacturer or wholesaler who violates this section.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 34, p. 399;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-334;

R.S.1943, § 53-176;

Laws 1979, LB 224, § 6;

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 59.